Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 10
ADMINISTRATION OF FUNDS UNDER THE "FEDERAL TRANSIT ACT"

43-1-1001. Urban mass transportation grants.

The department of transportation and the executive director thereof are hereby designated and authorized to take all steps and adopt all procedures necessary to make and enter into such contracts or agreements as are necessary for the state application and administration of any funds made available under the "Federal Transit Act", codified at 49 U.S.C. sec. 5301 et seq.

The authority contained in subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to federal grant funds where there exists a designated recipient for such funds, and funds made available under the "Federal Transit Act", 49 U.S.C. sec. 5309, within the Denver regional transportation district, and funds for other projects in urbanized areas with populations in excess of two hundred thousand persons, except as provided in sections 43-1-601 and 43-1-901.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire part added, p. 1630, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 1098, § 126, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 1346, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 543, § 2, effective May 5.

L. 2005:

(2) amended, p. 291, § 45, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 1514, § 82, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1917, § 140, effective August 5.

43-1-1002. Rules and regulations.

The state department of transportation is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this part 10.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 1347, § 6, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For promulgation of rules and regulations, see article 4 of title 24.